Utah statutes.
16-10a-1001.   Authority to amend.

(1)  A corporation may amend its articles of incorporation at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation or to delete a provision not required in the articles of incorporation.  Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles of incorporation is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

(2)  A shareholder does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles of incorporation, including any provision relating to management, control, capital structure, purpose, duration of the corporation, or dividend entitlement.



Enacted by Chapter 277, 1992 General Session

